Maryland, session 2025, SB0666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Community action agency” means:
(1) a governmental unit in a political subdivision;
(2) a governmental unit created by a combination of political subdivisions;
(3) an agency designated as a community action agency under the
Economic Opportunity Act of 1964 as amended by the Community Services Block Grant
Program, 42 U.S.C. §§ 9901 through 9926; or
(4) a private, nonprofit organization that meets the requirements for
designation as a community action agency.
– 1 –

Ch. 288 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
8–107.
(c) A community action agency shall actively supplement local efforts to combat
poverty by:
(1) focusing resources on the most needy;
(2) providing employment opportunities for low–income persons;
(3) closing service gaps; and
(4) enabling low–income persons to participate in community action
programs and projects.
8–110.
FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2032 2030, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $250,000 TO
THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) TO BE USED SOLELY AS AN OPERATING GRANT TO ELIGIBLE
COMMUNITY ACTION AGENCIES; AND
(2) TO BE DISTRIBUTED IN THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS FOR THE
FOLLOWING YEARS:
(I) $500,000 FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028;
(II) $1,000,000 FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029;
(III) $3,000,000 FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030;
(IV) $5,000,000 FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031; AND
(V) $7,000,000 FOR FISCAL YEAR 2032.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 7 years, and, at the end of June 30, 2032,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –